Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1810
Patient, defined.

Patient means an individual recipient of medical nutrition therapy, whether in the outpatient or inpatient setting.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 632;

Laws 2023, LB227, § 41.